Vermont, session 2025-2026, H669.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 31 V.S.A. § 665 is added to read:
§ 665. MOBILE AND INTERNET LOTTERY SALES; AUTHORITY AND
PROCEDURES
(a) Authority of the Board. The Board of Liquor and Lottery, through the
Commissioner of Liquor and Lottery, either independently or through a
contractor, is authorized to sell tickets, products, and subscriptions through
VT LEG #385986 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.669
2026 Page 2 of 3
mobile applications, by mobile devices, or over the internet for the lottery
games established and operated pursuant to this chapter.
(b) Purchases only within the State. All lottery purchases made through
mobile applications, by mobile devices, or over the internet shall be initiated
and received within the State and shall not be intentionally routed outside the
State. The incidental intermediate routing of a purchase shall not determine
the location or locations in which the wager is initiated, received, or otherwise
made.
(c) Public Records Act exemptions. When produced or acquired by the
Department of Liquor and Lottery pursuant to this section, the following
records are exempt from public inspection and copying under the Public
Records Act and shall be kept confidential:
(1) personal, financial, and wager information associated with a person’s
purchase of tickets, products, and subscriptions;
(2) trade secrets, business records, financial records, and related
information; and
(3) records relating to security, technology, facilities, or systems used
for the sale of tickets, products, or subscriptions.
(d) Exemption review. The Public Records Act exemptions created in this
section shall not be subject to the provisions of 1 V.S.A. § 317(e).
VT LEG #385986 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.669
2026 Page 3 of 3
(e) Procedures. The Board shall adopt procedures pursuant to 3 V.S.A.
§ 835 to govern the sales authorized by this section.
(1) For each procedure proposed to be adopted or amended pursuant to
this section, the Board shall publish the proposed procedure on the
Department’s website and hold not less than two public hearings at which
members of the public may seek additional information or submit oral or
written comments concerning the proposed procedure.
(2) The Board shall not be required to initiate rulemaking pursuant to
3 V.S.A. § 831(c) in relation to a procedure adopted pursuant to this section. A
procedure adopted pursuant to this section shall have the force of law and be
binding on all persons who purchase tickets, products, or subscriptions within
the State.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385986 v.1